Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1211
City bus system receiving state funds; reduced fares for elderly or handicapped persons.

The fares charged elderly or handicapped persons shall not exceed one-half of the rates generally applicable to other persons at peak hours for each one-way trip for any city bus system operating over regularly scheduled routes and receiving state funds pursuant to the Nebraska Public Transportation Act. The recipient of state funds under the act may designate certain peak hours during which this section shall not apply.

Laws 1975, LB 443, § 14;

Laws 1982, LB 942, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-3910;

Laws 1993, LB 158, § 7.